da: Bagelstørrelse: Ekstra stor; Jumbo; Stor; Mini; Standard; Tynd; Andet
es: Tamaño del bagel: Extragrande; Jumbo; Grande; Mini; Estándar; Fino; Otro
bg-BG: Размер на бейгъла: Много голям; Джъмбо; Голям; Мини; Стандартен; Тънък; Друго
fr: Taille du bagel: Très grand; Géant; Grand; Mini; Standard; Fin; Autre
ro-RO: Dimensiunea covrigului: Extra mare; Jumbo; Mare; Mini; Standard; Subțire; Altele
zh-CN: 贝果尺寸: 特大; 巨型; 大号; 迷你; 标准; 薄款; 其他
fi: Bagelin koko: Erittäin suuri; Jumbo; Suuri; Mini; Vakio; Ohut; Muu
it: Bagel taglia: Extra large; Jumbo; Grande; Mini; Standard; Sottile; Altro
nb: Bagelstørrelse: Ekstra stor; Jumbo; Stor; Mini; Standard; Tynn; Annet
de: Bagelgröße: Extra groß; Jumbo; Groß; Mini; Standard; Dünn; Sonstige
zh-TW: 貝果尺寸: 特大; 巨大; 大; 迷你; 標準; 薄; 其他
pt-BR: Tamanho do bagel: Extragrande; Jumbo; Grande; Mini; Padrão; Fino; Outro
lt-LT: Riestainio dydis: Labai didelė; Milžiniškas; Didelis; Mini; Standartinis; Plonas; Kita
tr: Simit büyüklüğü: Ekstra büyük; Jumbo; Büyük; Mini; Standart; İnce; Diğer
hr-HR: Veličina peciva bagel: Iznimno veliko; Jumbo; Veliko; Mini; Standardno; Tanko; Ostalo
en: Bagel size: Extra large; Jumbo; Large; Mini; Standard; Thin; Other
sv: Bagelstorlek: Extra stor; Jumbo; Stor; Mini; Standard; Tunn; Övrigt
cs: Velikost bagelu: Extra velké; Jumbo; Velké; Mini; Standardní; Tenké; Jiné
hu: Bagel mérete: Extra nagy; Óriás; Nagy; Mini; Normál; Vékony; Egyéb
ko: 베이글 크기: 특대; 점보; 라지; 미니; 표준; 씬; 기타
ru: Размер бублика: Очень большой; Джамбо; Большой; Мини; Стандартный; Тонкий; Другое
ja: ベーグルサイズ: 特大; ジャンボ; 大; ミニ; 標準; 薄型; その他
sl-SI: Velikost bagela: Izjemno velik; Jumbo; Velik; Mini; Standardni; Tanek; Drugo
el: Μέγεθος Bagel: Εξαιρετικά μεγάλο; Jumbo; Μεγάλο; Μίνι; Κανονικό; Λεπτό; Άλλο
sk-SK: Veľkosť bagelu: Extra veľký; Jumbo; Veľký; Mini; Štandardný; Tenký; Iný
pt-PT: Tamanho do bagel: Extra grande; Jumbo; Grande; Mini; Padrão; Fino; Outro
th: ขนาดเบเกิล: ใหญ่พิเศษ; จัมโบ้; ใหญ่; มินิ; มาตรฐาน; บาง; อื่นๆ
nl: Bagel formaat: Extra groot; Jumbo; Groot; Mini; Standaard; Dun; Overig
pl: Rozmiar bajgla: Bardzo duży; Jumbo; Duży; Mini; Standardowy; Cienki; Inne
vi: Kích thước túi: Cực lớn; Khổng lồ; Lớn; Mini; Tiêu chuẩn; Mỏng; Khác